Maryland, session 2026, HB1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Department of Information Technology shall convene a workgroup on the
Medicaid Management Information System mainframe system replacement.
(b) The workgroup shall consist of:
(1) at least one representative from the Maryland Department of Health;
(2) at least one representative from the Department of Human Services;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1167*

HOUSE BILL 1167
(3) at least one representative from the Maryland Health Benefit
Exchange;
(4) at least one representative from the Office of the Comptroller; and
(5) two individuals with experience in health insurance policy, of whom:
(i) one shall be designated by the President of the Senate; and
(ii) one shall be designated by the Speaker of the House.
(c) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the workgroup shall assist
the Maryland Department of Health in procuring and transitioning to a replacement
mainframe system for the Medicaid Management Information System on or before July 1,
2029, that:
(1) promotes payment accuracy, system security and performance,
responsiveness, and modernizes the existing system’s outdated technological
infrastructure; and
(2) supports, at minimum, the functionalities of the existing system,
including provider enrollment, medical, dental, and pharmacy claims processing,
beneficiary inquiries, data reporting, and audit functions in accordance with the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services and other applicable federal requirements, including
42 C.F.R. Part 322, Subpart C.
(d) The workgroup may consult with experts as necessary in conducting its duties.
(e) (1) On or before September 1, 2026, and every 3 months thereafter through
September 1, 2029, the workgroup shall provide to the Senate Budget and Taxation
Committee, the Senate Finance Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, the
House Health Committee, and the Joint Audit and Evaluation Committee, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, a report on the progress made toward
procuring a Medicaid Management Information System mainframe system replacement.
(2) In addition to the reports required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, on or before January 1, 2027, 2028, and 2029, the workgroup shall submit a
report to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate Finance Committee, the
House Appropriations Committee, the House Health Committee, and the Joint Audit and
Evaluation Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on
the activities of the workgroup, including a timeline for meeting the implementation
deadline for the replacement.
(a) In this section, “Department” means the Maryland Department of Health.
(b) (1) The Department shall procure a replacement system for the State’s
Medicaid Management Information System to promote payment accuracy, system security

HOUSE BILL 1167 3
and performance, responsiveness, and to modernize the current system’s outdated
technological infrastructure, subject to approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services as required.
(2) The replacement system shall support, at a minimum, the
functionalities of the existing system, including provider enrollment, medical, dental and
pharmacy claims processing, beneficiary inquiries, data reporting, and audit functions in
accordance with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and other applicable
federal requirements, including 42 C.F.R. Part 433, Subpart C.
(c) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, the Department shall integrate the
replacement system with the Medicaid Enterprise System.
(2) On or before January 1, 2028, the Department shall:
(i) transition all Department applications from the Annapolis Data
Center to the replacement system; and
(ii) decommission the legacy Medicaid Management Information
System on completion of the transition.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
June 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for 4 years and 1 month and, at the end of June 30,
2030, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated
and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.